Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.070

Authorization certificate.

Before a mutual savings bank shall be authorized to do any business the director shall be satisfied that the corporation has in good faith complied with all the requirements of law and fulfilled all the conditions precedent to commencing business imposed by this title. If satisfied that the corporation has in good faith complied with all the requirements of law, and fulfilled all the conditions precedent to commencing business imposed by this title, the director shall within six months after the date upon which the proposed organization certificate was filed with him or her for examination, but in no case after the expiration of that period, issue under his or her hand and official seal in triplicate an authorization certificate to such corporation. Such authorization certificate shall state that the corporation therein named has complied with all the requirements of law, that it is authorized to transact at the place designated in its certificate of incorporation, the business of a mutual savings bank. One of the triplicate authorization certificates shall be transmitted by the director to the corporation therein named, and the other two authorization certificates shall be filed by the director in the same public offices where the certificate of incorporation is filed, and shall be attached to said incorporation certificate.

[ 1994 c 92 s 314; 1981 c 302 s 28; 1955 c 13 s 32.08.070. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 5; RRS s 3317.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.